Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,194
Procedure for and effect of administrative
dissolution.

(MBCA
14.21) (a) If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist
under section 21-2,193 for dissolving a corporation, the Secretary of State
shall serve the corporation with written notice of such determination under
section 21-236.

(b) If the corporation does
not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction
of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of
State does not exist within sixty days after service of the notice is perfected
under section 21-236, the Secretary of State shall administratively dissolve
the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground
or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The Secretary of State
shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation
under section 21-236.

(c)
A corporation administratively dissolved continues its corporate existence
but may not carry on any business except that necessary to wind up and liquidate
its business and affairs under section 21-2,188 and notify claimants under
sections 21-2,189 and 21-2,190.

(d) The administrative dissolution of a corporation
does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 194.